Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2010.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5093XS (6) 91 jda/jh S.F. 2010 Section 1. Section 282.18, subsection 10, paragraph b, 1 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 (1) A receiving district with a total enrollment of less 3 than two thousand students may send school vehicles not more 4 than two miles into the district of residence of the pupil 5 using the open enrollment option under this section , for the 6 purpose of transporting the pupil to and from school in the 7 receiving district, if the pupilâs primary residence is closer 8 to the attendance center the pupil attends in the receiving 9 district than the residence is to the attendance center the 10 pupil would be assigned in the sending district. 11 Sec. 2. Section 282.18, subsection 10, paragraph b, 12 subparagraph (2), unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended 13 to read as follows: 14 Notwithstanding subparagraph (1), a receiving district with 15 a total enrollment of greater than or equal to two thousand 16 students may send school vehicles two miles or more into the 17 district of residence of the pupil using the open enrollment 18 option under this section , for the purpose of transporting the 19 pupil to and from school in the receiving district, regardless 20 of the distance between the pupilâs primary residence and the 21 attendance center the pupil attends in the receiving district 22 or the attendance center the pupil would be assigned in the 23 sending district, if all of the following apply: 24